Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2706.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE XIX-LPENNSYLVANIA CHILD AND DEPENDENTCARE ENHANCEMENT TAX CREDIT PROGRAMSection 1901-L. Scope of article.This article relates to the Pennsylvania Child and Dependent 123456789101112131415161718192021 Care Enhancement Tax Credit Program.Section 1902-L. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Applicable percent."(1) For taxable years ending before January 1, 2027, as defined in section 21(a)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 in effect for the taxable years beginning after December 31, 2021, and ending before January 1, 2023.(2) For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2026, as defined in section 21(a)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended."Department." The Department of Revenue of the Commonwealth."Employment-related expenses." As defined in section 21(b)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986."Internal Revenue Code of 1986." The Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (Public Law 99-514, 26 U.S.C. § 1 et seq.)."Qualifying individual." As defined in section 21(b)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986."Resident individual." An individual who meets any of the following criteria:(1) Is domiciled in this Commonwealth, unless the individual maintains no permanent place of abode in this Commonwealth and does maintain a permanent place of abode elsewhere and spends in the aggregate no more than 30 days of the taxable year in this Commonwealth.(2) Is not domiciled in this Commonwealth, but maintains a permanent place of abode in this Commonwealth and spends in the aggregate more than 183 days of the taxable year in this 20260HB2706PN3782 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Commonwealth."Section 21 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986." Section 21 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (Public Law 99-514, 26 U.S.C. § 21)."Tax credit." The Pennsylvania child and dependent care enhancement tax credit provided for under this article."Tax liability." The liability for taxes imposed under Article III, excluding any tax withheld by an employer under Article III of the Tax Reform Code of 1971."Taxable year." As defined in section 301."Taxpayer." A resident individual subject to the tax imposed under Article III.Section 1903-L. Credit for child and dependent care employment- related expenses.(a) Tax credit.--For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2021, a taxpayer who receives a credit under section 21 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 may claim a tax credit against the taxpayer's tax liability.(b) Amount of tax credit.--The amount of the tax credit under subsection (a) for the taxable year beginning after December 31, 2021, and ending before January 1, 2023, shall be equal to 30% of:(1) the actual amount of employment-related expenses incurred by the taxpayer and claimed for the Federal tax credit under section 21 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 during the prior taxable year or the following, as applicable, whichever is less:(i) $3,000 for one qualifying individual with respect to the taxpayer; or(ii) $6,000 for two or more qualifying individuals 20260HB2706PN3782 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 with respect to the taxpayer; multiplied by(2) the applicable percent, with respect to the taxpayer, in effect for the taxable year beginning after December 31, 2021, and ending before January 1, 2023.(c) Amount of tax credit in taxable years before January 1, 2027.--The amount of the tax credit under subsection (a) for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2022, and ending before January 1, 2027, shall be equal to 100% of:(1) the actual amount of employment-related expenses incurred by the taxpayer and claimed for the Federal tax credit under section 21 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 during the prior taxable year or the following, as applicable, whichever is less:(i) $3,000 for one qualifying individual with respect to the taxpayer; or(ii) $6,000 for two or more qualifying individuals with respect to the taxpayer; multiplied by(2) the applicable percent, with respect to the taxpayer, in effect for the taxable year beginning after December 31, 2021, and ending before January 1, 2023.(d) Amount of tax credit for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2026.--The amount of the tax credit under subsection (a) for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2026, shall be equal to 100% of:(1) the actual amount of employment-related expenses incurred by the taxpayer and claimed for the Federal tax credit under section 21 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 during the prior taxable years or the following, as applicable, whichever is less:(i) $3,000 for one qualifying individual with 20260HB2706PN3782 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 respect to the taxpayer; or(ii) $6,000 for two or more qualifying individuals with respect to the taxpayer; multiplied by(2) the applicable percent, with respect to the taxpayer, in effect for the taxable year in which the taxpayer seeks the tax credit.(e) Claim of tax credit.--A taxpayer shall claim a tax credit under this section on a return filed under section 330.(f) Applicability of tax credit.--The tax credit under this section shall be applied against the taxpayer's tax liability. If the tax credit exceeds the taxpayer's tax liability, the department may issue a refund under the procedures specified in section 346.Section 1904-L. Prohibitions.The following apply:(1) A taxpayer is not entitled to carry over, carry back or sell, assign or transfer a tax credit under this article.(2) A taxpayer may not claim a tax credit for the same employment-related expenses used to claim a tax credit on a return filed by another taxpayer.Section 1905-L. Application of Internal Revenue Code of 1986.The provisions of section 21 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, and any Federal regulations promulgated regarding those provisions, shall apply to the department's interpretation and administration of the tax credit provided for under this article.Section 1906-L. Departmental duties.The department shall publish guidelines and may promulgate regulations necessary for the implementation and administration of this article.20260HB2706PN3782 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 1907-L. Report to General Assembly.(a) Annual report.--No later than March 1, 2024, and each March 1 thereafter, the department shall submit a report to the General Assembly indicating the effectiveness of the tax credit under this article.(b) Information required.--The report required under subsection (a) shall include, but not be limited to, the following information:(1) The number of tax credits approved under this article.(2) The amount of tax credits approved under this article.(3) The amount of tax credits claimed under this article.(4) The amount of tax credits refunded under this article.Section 2. Repeals are as follows:(1) The General Assembly declares that the repeal under paragraph (2) is necessary to effectuate the addition of Article XIX-L of the act.(2) Article XVI-W of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.343, No.176), known as The Fiscal Code, is repealed.Section 3. The addition of Article XIX-L of the act is a continuation of Article XVI-W of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.343, No.176), known as The Fiscal Code. The following apply:(1) Except as otherwise provided in Article XIX-L of the act, all activities initiated under the Article XVI-W of The Fiscal Code shall continue and remain in full force and effect and may be completed under Article XIX-L of the act. 20260HB2706PN3782 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Orders, regulations, rules and decisions which were made under Article XVI-W of The Fiscal Code and which are in effect on the effective date of section 2 of this act shall remain in full force and effect until revoked, vacated or modified under Article XIX-L of the act. Contracts, obligations and collective bargaining agreements entered into under Article XVI-W of The Fiscal Code are not affected nor impaired by the repeal of Article XVI-W of The Fiscal Code.(2) Except as specified in paragraph (3), any difference in language between Article XIX-L of the act and Article XVI-W of The Fiscal Code is intended only to conform to the style of Article XIX-L of the act and is not intended to change or affect the legislative intent, judicial construction or administration and implementation of Article XVI-W of The Fiscal Code.(3) Paragraph (2) does not apply to the following provisions:(i) The addition of the definition of "applicable percent" in section 1902-L of the act.(ii) The addition of sections 1903-L(c) and (d) and 1905-L of the act.(iii) The removal of section 1605.1-W of The Fiscal Code from Article XIX-L of the act.Section 4. This act shall take effect immediately.20260HB2706PN3782 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324